Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-483
Producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, importer, or exporter; application for license; contents.

Before engaging in business as a producer, supplier, distributor, wholesaler, importer, or exporter, a person shall file an application with the department. The application shall be filed upon a form prepared and furnished by the department. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number. The application shall contain such information as the department deems necessary.

Laws 1925, c. 172, § 2, p. 449;

Laws 1929, c. 149, § 1, p. 520;

C.S.1929, § 66-402;

Laws 1933, c. 106, § 1, p. 433;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 66-402;

R.S.1943, § 66-402;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 66-402;

Laws 1991, LB 627, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 1013, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 56;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 149;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 6.